District of Columbia statutes.
10-157

Glover Parkway and Children’s Playground — Part of park system.

The Glover Parkway and Children’s Playground and additions thereto, when acquired, shall become a part of the park system of the District of Columbia.

June 6, 1924, 43 Stat. 464, ch. 271, § 2

History

1981 Ed., § 8-157.
1973 Ed., § 8-163.

Prior Codifications